test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-sanymash_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

# todo: 
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


   Noun - шанымаш: # Noun 'a thought'
     шанымаш+N+Sg+Nom: шанымаш
     шанымаш+N+Sg+Gen: шанымашын
     шанымаш+N+Sg+Acc: шанымашым
     шанымаш+N+Sg+Com: шанымашге
     шанымаш+N+Sg+Dat: шанымашлан
     шанымаш+N+Sg+Ine: [шанымашты, шанымашышты]
     шанымаш+N+Sg+Ill: [шанымашыш, шанымашкы, шанымашышкы]
     шанымаш+N+Sg+Lat: шанымашеш
     шанымаш+N+Sg+Cmpr: шанымашлз
     шанымаш+N+Sg+Abe: шанымашде

     шанымаш+N+Pl+Nom: шанымашвлӓ

     шанымаш+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: шанымашем
     шанымаш+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom: шанымашет
     шанымаш+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom: шанымашыжы
     шанымаш+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom: шанымашна
     шанымаш+N+Sg+PxPl2+Nom: шанымашда
     шанымаш+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom: шанымашышты
